prince/dictionaries/pt-BR.aff
SFX i   er     ido      querer
SFX i   er     o      querer
SFX i   er     íamos      querer
SFX i   er     íeis      querer
SFX i   erer   is      querer
SFX i   erer   isemos      querer
SFX i   erer   iser      querer
SFX i   erer   isera      querer
SFX i   erer   iseram      querer
SFX i   erer   iseras      querer
SFX i   erer   iserdes      querer
SFX i   erer   iserem      querer
SFX i   erer   iseres      querer
SFX i   erer   isermos      querer
SFX i   erer   isesse      querer
SFX i   erer   isessem      querer
SFX i   erer   isesses      querer
SFX i   erer   iseste      querer
SFX i   erer   isestes      querer
SFX i   erer   iséramos      querer
SFX i   erer   iséreis      querer
SFX i   erer   isésseis      querer
SFX i   erer   iséssemos      querer
